test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nouns2-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
  Nouns:
    meri+N+Pl+Abe: meredeta
    meri+N+Pl+Abl: meredelt
    meri+N+Pl+Ade: meredel
    meri+N+Pl+All: meredele
    meri+N+Pl+Com: meredega
    meri+N+Pl+Ela: meredest
    meri+N+Pl+Ess: meredena
    meri+N+Pl+Gen: merede
    meri+N+Pl+Ill: meredesse
    meri+N+Pl+Ine: meredes
    meri+N+Pl+Nom: mered
    meri+N+Pl+Par: meresid
    meri+N+Pl+Tra: meredeks
    meri+N+Pl+Trm: meredeni
    meri+N+Sg+Abe: mereta
    meri+N+Sg+Abl: merelt
    meri+N+Sg+Ade: merel
    meri+N+Sg+All: merele
    meri+N+Sg+Com: merega
    meri+N+Sg+Ela: merest
    meri+N+Sg+Ess: merena
    meri+N+Sg+Gen: mere
    meri+N+Sg+Ill: merre
    meri+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: meresse
    meri+N+Sg+Ine: meres
    meri+N+Sg+Nom: meri
    meri+N+Sg+Par: merd
    meri+N+Sg+Tra: mereks
    meri+N+Sg+Trm: mereni
    mesi+N+Pl+Abe: meteta
    mesi+N+Pl+Abl: metelt
    mesi+N+Pl+Ade: metel
    mesi+N+Pl+All: metele
    mesi+N+Pl+Com: metega
    mesi+N+Pl+Ela: metest
    mesi+N+Pl+Ess: metena
    mesi+N+Pl+Gen: mete
    mesi+N+Pl+Ill: metesse
    mesi+N+Pl+Ine: metes
    mesi+N+Pl+Nom: meed
    mesi+N+Pl+Par: mesi
    mesi+N+Pl+Tra: meteks
    mesi+N+Pl+Trm: meteni
    mesi+N+Sg+Abe: meeta
    mesi+N+Sg+Abl: meelt
    mesi+N+Sg+Ade: meel
    mesi+N+Sg+All: meele
    mesi+N+Sg+Com: meega
    mesi+N+Sg+Ela: meest
    mesi+N+Sg+Ess: meena
    mesi+N+Sg+Gen: mee
    mesi+N+Sg+Ill: meesse
    mesi+N+Sg+Ine: mees
    mesi+N+Sg+Nom: mesi
    mesi+N+Sg+Par: mett
    mesi+N+Sg+Tra: meeks
    mesi+N+Sg+Trm: meeni
    muie+N+Pl+Abe: muieteta
    muie+N+Pl+Abl: muietelt
    muie+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: muigeilt
    muie+N+Pl+Ade: muietel
    muie+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: muigeil
    muie+N+Pl+All: muietele
    muie+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: muigeile
    muie+N+Pl+Com: muietega
    muie+N+Pl+Ela: muietest
    muie+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: muigeist
    muie+N+Pl+Ess: muietena
    muie+N+Pl+Gen: muiete
    muie+N+Pl+Ill: muietesse
    muie+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: muigeisse
    muie+N+Pl+Ine: muietes
    muie+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: muigeis
    muie+N+Pl+Nom: muiged
    muie+N+Pl+Par: muigeid
    muie+N+Pl+Tra: muieteks
    muie+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: muigeiks
    muie+N+Pl+Trm: muieteni
    muie+N+Sg+Abe: muigeta
    muie+N+Sg+Abl: muigelt
    muie+N+Sg+Ade: muigel
    muie+N+Sg+All: muigele
    muie+N+Sg+Com: muigega
    muie+N+Sg+Ela: muigest
    muie+N+Sg+Ess: muigena
    muie+N+Sg+Gen: muige
    muie+N+Sg+Ill: muigesse
    muie+N+Sg+Ine: muiges
    muie+N+Sg+Nom: muie
    muie+N+Sg+Par: muiet
    muie+N+Sg+Tra: muigeks
    muie+N+Sg+Trm: muigeni
    mulle+N+Pl+Abe: mulleteta
    mulle+N+Pl+Abl: mulletelt
    mulle+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: muldeilt
    mulle+N+Pl+Ade: mulletel
    mulle+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: muldeil
    mulle+N+Pl+All: mulletele
    mulle+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: muldeile
    mulle+N+Pl+Com: mulletega
    mulle+N+Pl+Ela: mulletest
    mulle+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: muldeist
    mulle+N+Pl+Ess: mulletena
    mulle+N+Pl+Gen: mullete
    mulle+N+Pl+Ill: mulletesse
    mulle+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: muldeisse
    mulle+N+Pl+Ine: mulletes
    mulle+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: muldeis
    mulle+N+Pl+Nom: mulded
    mulle+N+Pl+Par: muldeid
    mulle+N+Pl+Tra: mulleteks
    mulle+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: muldeiks
    mulle+N+Pl+Trm: mulleteni
    mulle+N+Sg+Abe: muldeta
    mulle+N+Sg+Abl: muldelt
    mulle+N+Sg+Ade: muldel
    mulle+N+Sg+All: muldele
    mulle+N+Sg+Com: muldega
    mulle+N+Sg+Ela: muldest
    mulle+N+Sg+Ess: muldena
    mulle+N+Sg+Gen: mulde
    mulle+N+Sg+Ill: muldesse
    mulle+N+Sg+Ine: muldes
    mulle+N+Sg+Nom: mulle
    mulle+N+Sg+Par: mullet
    mulle+N+Sg+Tra: muldeks
    mulle+N+Sg+Trm: muldeni
    muuseum+N+Pl+Abe: muuseumideta
    muuseum+N+Pl+Abe+Use/Rare: muuseumiteta
    muuseum+N+Pl+Abl: muuseumidelt
    muuseum+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: [muuseumeilt, muuseumitelt]
    muuseum+N+Pl+Ade: muuseumidel
    muuseum+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: [muuseumeil, muuseumitel]
    muuseum+N+Pl+All: muuseumidele
    muuseum+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: [muuseumeile, muuseumitele]
    muuseum+N+Pl+Com: muuseumidega
    muuseum+N+Pl+Com+Use/Rare: muuseumitega
    muuseum+N+Pl+Ela: muuseumidest
    muuseum+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: [muuseumeist, muuseumitest]
    muuseum+N+Pl+Ess: muuseumidena
    muuseum+N+Pl+Ess+Use/Rare: muuseumitena
    muuseum+N+Pl+Gen: muuseumide
    muuseum+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare: muuseumite
    muuseum+N+Pl+Ill: muuseumidesse
    muuseum+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: [muuseumeisse, muuseumitesse]
    muuseum+N+Pl+Ine: muuseumides
    muuseum+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: [muuseumeis, muuseumites]
    muuseum+N+Pl+Nom: muuseumid
    muuseum+N+Pl+Par: muuseume
    muuseum+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: muuseumeid
    muuseum+N+Pl+Tra: muuseumideks
    muuseum+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: [muuseumeiks, muuseumiteks]
    muuseum+N+Pl+Trm: muuseumideni
    muuseum+N+Pl+Trm+Use/Rare: muuseumiteni
    muuseum+N+Sg+Abe: muuseumita
    muuseum+N+Sg+Abl: muuseumilt
    muuseum+N+Sg+Ade: muuseumil
    muuseum+N+Sg+All: muuseumile
    muuseum+N+Sg+Com: muuseumiga
    muuseum+N+Sg+Ela: muuseumist
    muuseum+N+Sg+Ess: muuseumina
    muuseum+N+Sg+Gen: muuseumi
    muuseum+N+Sg+Ill: muuseumi
    muuseum+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: muuseumisse
    muuseum+N+Sg+Ine: muuseumis
    muuseum+N+Sg+Nom: muuseum
    muuseum+N+Sg+Par: muuseumi
    muuseum+N+Sg+Par+Use/Rare: muuseumit
    muuseum+N+Sg+Tra: muuseumiks
    muuseum+N+Sg+Trm: muuseumini
    mõni+N+Pl+Abe: mõnedeta
    mõni+N+Pl+Abl: mõnedelt
    mõni+N+Pl+Ade: mõnedel
    mõni+N+Pl+All: mõnedele
    mõni+N+Pl+Com: mõnedega
    mõni+N+Pl+Ela: mõnedest
    mõni+N+Pl+Ess: mõnedena
    mõni+N+Pl+Gen: mõnede
    mõni+N+Pl+Ill: mõnedesse
    mõni+N+Pl+Ine: mõnedes
    mõni+N+Pl+Nom: mõned
    mõni+N+Pl+Par: mõnesid
    mõni+N+Pl+Tra: mõnedeks
    mõni+N+Pl+Trm: mõnedeni
    mõni+N+Sg+Abe: mõneta
    mõni+N+Sg+Abl: mõnelt
    mõni+N+Sg+Ade: mõnel
    mõni+N+Sg+All: mõnele
    mõni+N+Sg+Com: mõnega
    mõni+N+Sg+Ela: mõnest
    mõni+N+Sg+Ess: mõnena
    mõni+N+Sg+Gen: mõne
    mõni+N+Sg+Ill: mõnda
    mõni+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: mõnesse
    mõni+N+Sg+Ine: mõnes
    mõni+N+Sg+Nom: mõni
    mõni+N+Sg+Par: mõnda
    mõni+N+Sg+Par+Use/Rare: mõnd
    mõni+N+Sg+Tra: mõneks
    mõni+N+Sg+Trm: mõneni
    mähe+N+Pl+Abe: mähkmeteta
    mähe+N+Pl+Abl: mähkmetelt
    mähe+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: mähkmeilt
    mähe+N+Pl+Ade: mähkmetel
    mähe+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: mähkmeil
    mähe+N+Pl+All: mähkmetele
    mähe+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: mähkmeile
    mähe+N+Pl+Com: mähkmetega
    mähe+N+Pl+Ela: mähkmetest
    mähe+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: mähkmeist
    mähe+N+Pl+Ess: mähkmetena
    mähe+N+Pl+Gen: mähkmete
    mähe+N+Pl+Ill: mähkmetesse
    mähe+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: mähkmeisse
    mähe+N+Pl+Ine: mähkmetes
    mähe+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: mähkmeis
    mähe+N+Pl+Nom: mähkmed
    mähe+N+Pl+Par: mähkmeid
    mähe+N+Pl+Tra: mähkmeteks
    mähe+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: mähkmeiks
    mähe+N+Pl+Trm: mähkmeteni
    mähe+N+Sg+Abe: mähkmeta
    mähe+N+Sg+Abl: mähkmelt
    mähe+N+Sg+Ade: mähkmel
    mähe+N+Sg+All: mähkmele
    mähe+N+Sg+Com: mähkmega
    mähe+N+Sg+Ela: mähkmest
    mähe+N+Sg+Ess: mähkmena
    mähe+N+Sg+Gen: mähkme
    mähe+N+Sg+Ill: mähkmesse
    mähe+N+Sg+Ine: mähkmes
    mähe+N+Sg+Nom: mähe
    mähe+N+Sg+Par: mähet
    mähe+N+Sg+Tra: mähkmeks
    mähe+N+Sg+Trm: mähkmeni
    naine+N+Pl+Abe: naisteta
    naine+N+Pl+Abl: naistelt
    naine+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: naisilt
    naine+N+Pl+Ade: naistel
    naine+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: naisil
    naine+N+Pl+All: naistele
    naine+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: naisile
    naine+N+Pl+Com: naistega
    naine+N+Pl+Ela: naistest
    naine+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: naisist
    naine+N+Pl+Ess: naistena
    naine+N+Pl+Gen: naiste
    naine+N+Pl+Ill: naistesse
    naine+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: naisisse
    naine+N+Pl+Ine: naistes
    naine+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: naisis
    naine+N+Pl+Nom: naised
    naine+N+Pl+Par: naisi
    naine+N+Pl+Tra: naisteks
    naine+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: naisiks
    naine+N+Pl+Trm: naisteni
    naine+N+Sg+Abe: naiseta
    naine+N+Sg+Abl: naiselt
    naine+N+Sg+Ade: naisel
    naine+N+Sg+All: naisele
    naine+N+Sg+Com: naisega
    naine+N+Sg+Ela: naisest
    naine+N+Sg+Ess: naisena
    naine+N+Sg+Gen: naise
    naine+N+Sg+Ill: naisesse
    naine+N+Sg+Ine: naises
    naine+N+Sg+Nom: naine
    naine+N+Sg+Par: naist
    naine+N+Sg+Tra: naiseks
    naine+N+Sg+Trm: naiseni
    niin+N+Pl+Abe: niinteta
    niin+N+Pl+Abl: niintelt
    niin+N+Pl+Ade: niintel
    niin+N+Pl+All: niintele
    niin+N+Pl+Com: niintega
    niin+N+Pl+Ela: niintest
    niin+N+Pl+Ess: niintena
    niin+N+Pl+Gen: niinte
    niin+N+Pl+Ill: niintesse
    niin+N+Pl+Ine: niintes
    niin+N+Pl+Nom: niined
    niin+N+Pl+Par: niinesid
    niin+N+Pl+Tra: niinteks
    niin+N+Pl+Trm: niinteni
    niin+N+Sg+Abe: niineta
    niin+N+Sg+Abl: niinelt
    niin+N+Sg+Ade: niinel
    niin+N+Sg+All: niinele
    niin+N+Sg+Com: niinega
    niin+N+Sg+Ela: niinest
    niin+N+Sg+Ess: niinena
    niin+N+Sg+Gen: niine
    niin+N+Sg+Ill: niinesse
    niin+N+Sg+Ine: niines
    niin+N+Sg+Nom: niin
    niin+N+Sg+Par: niint
    niin+N+Sg+Tra: niineks
    niin+N+Sg+Trm: niineni
    nimi+N+Pl+Abe: nimedeta
    nimi+N+Pl+Abl: nimedelt
    nimi+N+Pl+Ade: nimedel
    nimi+N+Pl+All: nimedele
    nimi+N+Pl+Com: nimedega
    nimi+N+Pl+Ela: nimedest
    nimi+N+Pl+Ess: nimedena
    nimi+N+Pl+Gen: nimede
    nimi+N+Pl+Ill: nimedesse
    nimi+N+Pl+Ine: nimedes
    nimi+N+Pl+Nom: nimed
    nimi+N+Pl+Par: nimesid
    nimi+N+Pl+Tra: nimedeks
    nimi+N+Pl+Trm: nimedeni
    nimi+N+Sg+Abe: nimeta
    nimi+N+Sg+Abl: nimelt
    nimi+N+Sg+Ade: nimel
    nimi+N+Sg+All: nimele
    nimi+N+Sg+Com: nimega
    nimi+N+Sg+Ela: nimest
    nimi+N+Sg+Ess: nimena
    nimi+N+Sg+Gen: nime
    nimi+N+Sg+Ill: nimesse
    nimi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: nimme
    nimi+N+Sg+Ine: nimes
    nimi+N+Sg+Nom: nimi
    nimi+N+Sg+Par: nime
    nimi+N+Sg+Tra: nimeks
    nimi+N+Sg+Trm: nimeni
    norse+N+Pl+Abe: norseteta
    norse+N+Pl+Abl: norsetelt
    norse+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: norskeilt
    norse+N+Pl+Ade: norsetel
    norse+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: norskeil
    norse+N+Pl+All: norsetele
    norse+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: norskeile
    norse+N+Pl+Com: norsetega
    norse+N+Pl+Ela: norsetest
    norse+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: norskeist
    norse+N+Pl+Ess: norsetena
    norse+N+Pl+Gen: norsete
    norse+N+Pl+Ill: norsetesse
    norse+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: norskeisse
    norse+N+Pl+Ine: norsetes
    norse+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: norskeis
    norse+N+Pl+Nom: norsked
    norse+N+Pl+Par: norskeid
    norse+N+Pl+Tra: norseteks
    norse+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: norskeiks
    norse+N+Pl+Trm: norseteni
    norse+N+Sg+Abe: norsketa
    norse+N+Sg+Abl: norskelt
    norse+N+Sg+Ade: norskel
    norse+N+Sg+All: norskele
    norse+N+Sg+Com: norskega
    norse+N+Sg+Ela: norskest
    norse+N+Sg+Ess: norskena
    norse+N+Sg+Gen: norske
    norse+N+Sg+Ill: norskesse
    norse+N+Sg+Ine: norskes
    norse+N+Sg+Nom: norse
    norse+N+Sg+Par: norset
    norse+N+Sg+Tra: norskeks
    norse+N+Sg+Trm: norskeni
    paas+N+Pl+Abe: paasideta
    paas+N+Pl+Abl: paasidelt
    paas+N+Pl+Ade: paasidel
    paas+N+Pl+All: paasidele
    paas+N+Pl+Com: paasidega
    paas+N+Pl+Ela: paasidest
    paas+N+Pl+Ess: paasidena
    paas+N+Pl+Gen: paaside
    paas+N+Pl+Ill: paasidesse
    paas+N+Pl+Ine: paasides
    paas+N+Pl+Nom: paed
    paas+N+Pl+Par: paase
    paas+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: paasisid
    paas+N+Pl+Tra: paasideks
    paas+N+Pl+Trm: paasideni
    paas+N+Sg+Abe: paeta
    paas+N+Sg+Abl: paelt
    paas+N+Sg+Ade: pael
    paas+N+Sg+All: paele
    paas+N+Sg+Com: paega
    paas+N+Sg+Ela: paest
    paas+N+Sg+Ess: paena
    paas+N+Sg+Gen: pae
    paas+N+Sg+Ill: paasi
    paas+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: paesse
    paas+N+Sg+Ine: paes
    paas+N+Sg+Nom: paas
    paas+N+Sg+Par: paasi
    paas+N+Sg+Tra: paeks
    paas+N+Sg+Trm: paeni
    pea+N+Pl+Abe: peadeta
    pea+N+Pl+Abl: peadelt
    pea+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: päilt
    pea+N+Pl+Ade: peadel
    pea+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: päil
    pea+N+Pl+All: peadele
    pea+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: päile
    pea+N+Pl+Com: peadega
    pea+N+Pl+Ela: peadest
    pea+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: päist
    pea+N+Pl+Ess: peadena
    pea+N+Pl+Gen: peade
    pea+N+Pl+Ill: peadesse
    pea+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: päisse
